Hawaii statutes.
§554G-4.5 Advisors. (a) A
transferor may appoint, through the trust instrument, one or more advisors or
protectors, including:

(1) Advisors who have authority under the terms of
the trust to remove and appoint trustees, advisors, trust committee members, or
protectors;

(2) Advisors who have authority under the terms of
the trust to direct, consent to, or disapprove of distributions from the trust;
and

(3) Advisors, including the transferor beneficiary of
the trust, who serve as investment advisors to the trust.

(b) While a trustee may appoint an advisor,
the administrative and non-administrative authority over the trust shall remain
with the trustee.

(c) Notwithstanding subsection (b), whenever
there is a dispute, deadlock, or difference of opinion between a trustee and an
advisor, the transferor may direct that the determination of the advisor shall
be binding upon the trustee; provided that the trustee shall bear no liability
or accountability for any act or transaction entered into or omitted as a
result of the enforcement of the advisor's determination. The trustee's
administrative and non-administrative fiduciary duty to the beneficiaries shall
be waived as to the specific act or transaction entered into or omitted as a
result of the enforcement of the advisor's determination; provided that:

(1) The trustee dissents in writing:

(A) Before the act or transaction is
completed;

(B) To a failure to act; or

(C) In a reasonably timely manner to enter
into a transaction; or

(2) If the advisor is appointed by the transferor
under the terms of the trust and section 560:7-302 applies to the trust and the
advisor, the trustee is not required to dissent in writing for the waiver of
the trustee's administrative and nonadministrative fiduciary duties to the
beneficiaries to take effect. [L 2011, c 161, §2; am L 2014, c 59, §2]

Previous
Vol12_Ch0501-0588
Next